District of Columbia statutes.
44-213

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue proposed rules, including a schedule of civil fines, to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

The Mayor may issue emergency rules, which shall be effective no more than 90 days and which shall be consistent with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-182, § 14, 35 DCR 7718

Section References

This section is referenced in § 44-202, § 44-203, § 44-204, § 44-208, § 44-209, and § 44-210.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1513.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-182, see Mayor’s Order 89-211, September 15, 1989.